en: Hull type: Catamaran; Monohull; Trimaran; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta trupa: Katamaran; Jednotrupac; Trimaran; Ostalo
tr: Gövde tipi: Katamaran; Tek gövdeli; Trimaran; Diğer
lt-LT: Korpuso tipas: Katamaranas; Vienkorpusinis; Trimaranas; Kita
zh-TW: 船體類型: 雙體船; 單體船; 三體船; 其他
sk-SK: Typ trupu: Katamarán; Jednotrup; Trimarán; Iné
nl: Romp type: Catamaran; Monohull; Trimaran; Overig
th: ประเภทตัวเรือ: คาตามารัน; โมโนฮัลล์; ไตรมารัน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul corpului: Catamaran; Monococă; Trimaran; Altele
pl: Typ kadłuba: Katamaran; Jednokadłubowiec; Trimaran; Inne
de: Rumpftyp: Katamaran; Einrumpfboot; Trimaran; Sonstiges
vi: Loại vỏ: Thuyền hai thân (Catamaran); Thuyền đơn thân; Thuyền ba thân (Trimaran); Khác
ja: 船体タイプ: カタマラン; モノハル; トリマラン; その他
bg-BG: Тип корпус: Катамаран; Еднокорпусен; Тримаран; Друго
cs: Typ trupu: Katamaran; Jednotrupá loď; Trimaran; Ostatní
fi: Rungon tyyppi: Katamaraani; Yksirunkoinen; Trimaraani; Muu
da: Skrogtype: Katamaran; Enkeltskrog; Trimaran; Andet
sv: Skrovtyp: Katamaran; Enskrov; Trimaran; Övrigt
ru: Тип корпуса: Катамаран; Однокорпусный; Тримаран; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de casco: Catamarã; Monocasco; Trimarã; Outro
nb: Skrogtype: Katamaran; Enkeltskrog; Trimaran; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta trupa: Katamaran; Eno trup; Trimaran; Drugo
zh-CN: 船体类型: 双体船; 单体船; 三体船; 其他
el: Τύπος κύτους: Καταμαράν; Μονοκάρινο; Τριμαράν; Άλλο
hu: Hajótest típusa: Katamarán; Egytestű; Trimarán; Egyéb
es: Tipo de casco: Catamarán; Monocasco; Trimarán; Otro
fr: Type de coque: Catamaran; Monocoque; Trimaran; Autre
ko: 선체 유형: 카타마란; 모노헐; 트리마란; 기타
it: Tipo di scafo: Catamarano; Monoscafo; Trimarano; Altro
pt-BR: Casco tipo: Catamarã; Monocasco; Trimarã; Outro